Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1324.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 69 O.S. 2021, Section 1711, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1711. The Oklahoma Turnpike Authority, subject to the
provisions hereof, and to Section 2 of this act, is hereby
authorized to fix, revise, charge and collect tolls for the use of
each turnpike project and the different parts or sections thereof,
except for use by law enforcement officers responsible for enforcing
the traffic laws and the general laws of the state and federal
governments on turnpikes, who shall be entitled to free use of every
Req. No. 12327 Page 1

such project in the performance of official duties connected with
such turnpike project, and to contract with any person, partnership,
association or corporation desiring the use of any part thereof,
including the right-of-way adjoining the paved portion, for placing
thereon telephone, telegraph, electric light or power lines, gas
stations, garages, stores, hotels, restaurants and advertising
signs, or for any other purpose except for tracks for railroad or
railway use, and to fix the terms, conditions, rents and rates of
charges for such use. Such tolls, subject to the other restrictions
hereof, shall be so fixed and adjusted in respect of the aggregate
of tolls from the turnpike project or projects in connection with
which the bonds of any issue shall have been issued pursuant to
Section 2 of this act as to provide a fund sufficient with other
revenues, if any, to pay (a) the cost of maintaining, repairing, and
operating such turnpike project or projects, and (b) the principal
of and the interest of such bonds as the same shall become due and
payable, and to create reserves for such purposes. The tolls and
all other revenues derived from the turnpike project or projects in
connection with which the bonds of any issue shall have been issued,
except such part thereof as may be necessary to pay such cost of
maintenance, repair, and operation and to provide such reserves
therefor as may be provided for in the resolution authorizing the
issuance of such bonds or in the trust agreement securing the same
shall be set aside at such regular intervals as may be provided in
Req. No. 12327 Page 2

such resolution or such trust agreement in a sinking fund which is
hereby pledged to, and charged with, the payment of (a) the interest
upon such bonds as such interest shall fall due, (b) the principal
of such bonds as the same shall fall due, (c) the necessary charges
of paying agents for paying principal and interest, and (d) the
redemption price or the purchase price of bonds retired by call or
purchase as therein provided, which are a charge against such fund.
The use and disposition of monies to the credit of such sinking fund
shall be subject to the provisions of the resolution authorizing the
issuance of such bonds or of such trust agreement. Except as may
otherwise be provided in such resolution or such trust agreement,
such sinking fund shall be a fund for all such bonds without
distinction or priority of one over another. The monies in the
sinking fund, less such reserve as may be provided in such
resolution or trust agreement, if not used within a reasonable time
for the purchase of bonds for cancellation as above provided, shall
be applied to the redemption of bonds at the redemption price then
applicable. Any person who leases, rents, or acquires control of
any gas station, garage, store, hotel, or restaurant must have been
a resident of, or been doing business in, Oklahoma for the past five
(5) years. Notwithstanding anything else herein contained to the
contrary, the Corporation Commission of the State of Oklahoma shall
exercise the jurisdiction now or hereafter vested in it to regulate
and control the operation of motor carriers of passengers and
Req. No. 12327 Page 3

frei ght, using or desiring to use any turnpike project, in the
manner and to the extent that it regulates or controls such carriers
using the highways of the state. The Authority shall not
discriminate against any group or class or individual member thereof
in fixing the amount of toll, rents, or charge for the use of the
turnpike project.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1711.1 of Title 69, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Oklahoma Turnpike Authority shall be required to obtain
legislative approval before increasing, decreasing, or making any
financial adjustments to toll rates on turnpikes in this state. The
Legislature shall provide such approval by joint resolution.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12327 JBH 01/31/25








Req. No. 12327 Page 4